Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4311
Risk management pool; dissolution.

A risk management pool shall not be voluntarily dissolved or otherwise cease to function without written approval by the Director of Insurance after he or she has determined that all claims and other legal obligations of the pool have been paid or that adequate provisions for such payment have been made.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 11.